North Carolina, session 2025, HB1228.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160D-601 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-601. Procedure for adopting, amending, or repealing development regulations.
…
(d) Down-Zoning. – No amendment to zoning regulations or a zoning map that
down-zones property shall be initiated, enacted, or enforced without the written consent of all
property owners whose property is the subject of the down-zoning amendment. For purposes of
this section, "down-zoning" means a zoning ordinance that affects an area of land in one of the
following ways:
(1) By decreasing the development density of the land to be less dense than was
allowed under its previous usage.
(2) By reducing the permitted uses of the land that are specified in a zoning
ordinance or land development regulation to fewer uses than were allowed
under its previous usage.
(3) By creating any type of nonconformity on land not in a residential zoning
district, including a nonconforming use, nonconforming lot, nonconforming
structure, nonconforming improvement, or nonconforming site element.
(e) Withdrawn or Denied Applications. – A development regulation or unified
development ordinance may not include waiting periods prohibiting a landowner, developer, or
applicant from refiling a denied or withdrawn application for a zoning map amendment, text
amendment, development application, or request for development approval.
(f) Historic Districts. – The designation of a historic district by zoning regulation
pursuant to G.S. 160D-944 shall not be deemed "down-zoning" for the purposes of this section."
SECTION 2.(a) This act applies only to Mecklenburg County.
SECTION 2.(b) This act is effective when it becomes law and applies retroactively
to December 11, 2024.
*H1228-v-1*